Illinois, session 104th, HB1762.
Be it enacted by the People of the State of Illinois, 3represented in the General Assembly: 4    Section 5. The Juvenile Court Act of 1987 is amended by 5changing Sections 1-3 and 2-17 as follows: 6    (705 ILCS 405/1-3)  (from Ch. 37, par. 801-3)7    Sec. 1-3. Definitions. Terms used in this Act, unless the 8context otherwise requires, have the following meanings 9ascribed to them:10    (1) "Adjudicatory hearing" means a hearing to determine 11whether the allegations of a petition under Section 2-13, 123-15, or 4-12 that a minor under 18 years of age is abused, 13neglected, or dependent, or requires authoritative 14intervention, or addicted, respectively, are supported by a 15preponderance of the evidence or whether the allegations of a 16petition under Section 5-520 that a minor is delinquent are 17proved beyond a reasonable doubt.18    (2) "Adult" means a person 21 years of age or older.19    (3) "Agency" means a public or private child care facility 20legally authorized or licensed by this State for placement or 21institutional care or for both placement and institutional 22care.23    (4) "Association" means any organization, public or   HB1762- 2 -LRB104 06312 JRC 16347 b1private, engaged in welfare functions which include services 2to or on behalf of children but does not include "agency" as 3herein defined.4    (4.05) Whenever a "best interest" determination is 5required, the following factors shall be considered in the 6context of the child's age and developmental needs:7        (a) the physical safety and welfare of the child, 8    including food, shelter, health, and clothing;9        (b) the development of the child's identity;10        (c) the child's background and ties, including 11    familial, cultural, and religious;12        (d) the child's sense of attachments, including:13            (i) where the child actually feels love, 14        attachment, and a sense of being valued (as opposed to 15        where adults believe the child should feel such love, 16        attachment, and a sense of being valued);17            (ii) the child's sense of security;18            (iii) the child's sense of familiarity;19            (iv) continuity of affection for the child;20            (v) the least disruptive placement alternative for 21        the child;22        (e) the child's wishes and long-term goals;23        (f) the child's community ties, including church, 24    school, and friends;25        (g) the child's need for permanence which includes the 26    child's need for stability and continuity of relationships   HB1762- 3 -LRB104 06312 JRC 16347 b1    with parent figures and with siblings and other relatives;2        (h) the uniqueness of every family and child;3        (i) the risks attendant to entering and being in 4    substitute care; and5        (j) the preferences of the persons available to care 6    for the child.7    (4.1) "Chronic truant" shall have the definition ascribed 8to it in Section 26-2a of the School Code.9    (5) "Court" means the circuit court in a session or 10division assigned to hear proceedings under this Act.11    (6) "Dispositional hearing" means a hearing to determine 12whether a minor should be adjudged to be a ward of the court, 13and to determine what order of disposition should be made in 14respect to a minor adjudged to be a ward of the court.15    (6.5) "Dissemination" or "disseminate" means to publish, 16produce, print, manufacture, distribute, sell, lease, exhibit, 17broadcast, display, transmit, or otherwise share information 18in any format so as to make the information accessible to 19others.20    (7) "Emancipated minor" means any minor 16 years of age or 21over who has been completely or partially emancipated under 22the Emancipation of Minors Act or under this Act.23    (7.03) "Expunge" means to physically destroy the records 24and to obliterate the minor's name from any official index, 25public record, or electronic database. 26    (7.05) "Foster parent" includes a relative caregiver   HB1762- 4 -LRB104 06312 JRC 16347 b1selected by the Department of Children and Family Services to 2provide care for the minor. 3    (7.07) "Guardian ad litem" means either (i) an attorney 4licensed in Illinois to practice law; or (ii) a person who 5holds at a minimum a bachelor's degree in psychology, 6psychiatry, social work, education, or any other relevant 7child-related discipline involving determining a child's best 8interests. A guardian ad litem must receive training as 9ordered by the Supreme Court to ensure the guardian ad litem 10has a fundamental working knowledge of abuser tactics and its 11effects on children in domestic violence cases. 12    (8) "Guardianship of the person" of a minor means the duty 13and authority to act in the best interests of the minor, 14subject to residual parental rights and responsibilities, to 15make important decisions in matters having a permanent effect 16on the life and development of the minor and to be concerned 17with the minor's general welfare. It includes but is not 18necessarily limited to:19        (a) the authority to consent to marriage, to 20    enlistment in the armed forces of the United States, or to 21    a major medical, psychiatric, and surgical treatment; to 22    represent the minor in legal actions; and to make other 23    decisions of substantial legal significance concerning the 24    minor;25        (b) the authority and duty of reasonable visitation, 26    except to the extent that these have been limited in the   HB1762- 5 -LRB104 06312 JRC 16347 b1    best interests of the minor by court order;2        (c) the rights and responsibilities of legal custody 3    except where legal custody has been vested in another 4    person or agency; and5        (d) the power to consent to the adoption of the minor, 6    but only if expressly conferred on the guardian in 7    accordance with Section 2-29, 3-30, or 4-27.8    (8.1) "Juvenile court record" includes, but is not limited 9to: 10        (a) all documents filed in or maintained by the 11    juvenile court pertaining to a specific incident, 12    proceeding, or individual; 13        (b) all documents relating to a specific incident, 14    proceeding, or individual made available to or maintained 15    by probation officers; 16        (c) all documents, video or audio tapes, photographs, 17    and exhibits admitted into evidence at juvenile court 18    hearings; or 19        (d) all documents, transcripts, records, reports, or 20    other evidence prepared by, maintained by, or released by 21    any municipal, county, or State agency or department, in 22    any format, if indicating involvement with the juvenile 23    court relating to a specific incident, proceeding, or 24    individual. 25    (8.2) "Juvenile law enforcement record" includes records 26of arrest, station adjustments, fingerprints, probation   HB1762- 6 -LRB104 06312 JRC 16347 b1adjustments, the issuance of a notice to appear, or any other 2records or documents maintained by any law enforcement agency 3relating to a minor suspected of committing an offense, and 4records maintained by a law enforcement agency that identifies 5a juvenile as a suspect in committing an offense, but does not 6include records identifying a juvenile as a victim, witness, 7or missing juvenile and any records created, maintained, or 8used for purposes of referral to programs relating to 9diversion as defined in subsection (6) of Section 5-105. 10    (9) "Legal custody" means the relationship created by an 11order of court in the best interests of the minor which imposes 12on the custodian the responsibility of physical possession of 13a minor and the duty to protect, train and discipline the minor 14and to provide the minor with food, shelter, education, and 15ordinary medical care, except as these are limited by residual 16parental rights and responsibilities and the rights and 17responsibilities of the guardian of the person, if any.18    (9.1) "Mentally capable adult relative" means a person 21 19years of age or older who is not suffering from a mental 20illness that prevents the person from providing the care 21necessary to safeguard the physical safety and welfare of a 22minor who is left in that person's care by the parent or 23parents or other person responsible for the minor's welfare. 24    (10) "Minor" means a person under the age of 21 years 25subject to this Act.26    (11) "Parent" means a father or mother of a child and   HB1762- 7 -LRB104 06312 JRC 16347 b1includes any adoptive parent. It also includes a person (i) 2whose parentage is presumed or has been established under the 3law of this or another jurisdiction or (ii) who has registered 4with the Putative Father Registry in accordance with Section 512.1 of the Adoption Act and whose paternity has not been ruled 6out under the law of this or another jurisdiction. It does not 7include a parent whose rights in respect to the minor have been 8terminated in any manner provided by law. It does not include a 9person who has been or could be determined to be a parent under 10the Illinois Parentage Act of 1984 or the Illinois Parentage 11Act of 2015, or similar parentage law in any other state, if 12that person has been convicted of or pled nolo contendere to a 13crime that resulted in the conception of the child under 14Section 11-1.20, 11-1.30, 11-1.40, 11-11, 12-13, 12-14, 1512-14.1, subsection (a) or (b) (but not subsection (c)) of 16Section 11-1.50 or 12-15, or subsection (a), (b), (c), (e), or 17(f) (but not subsection (d)) of Section 11-1.60 or 12-16 of the 18Criminal Code of 1961 or the Criminal Code of 2012, or similar 19statute in another jurisdiction unless upon motion of any 20party, other than the offender, to the juvenile court 21proceedings the court finds it is in the child's best interest 22to deem the offender a parent for purposes of the juvenile 23court proceedings.24    (11.1) "Permanency goal" means a goal set by the court as 25defined in subdivision (2) of Section 2-28.26    (11.2) "Permanency hearing" means a hearing to set the   HB1762- 8 -LRB104 06312 JRC 16347 b1permanency goal and to review and determine (i) the 2appropriateness of the services contained in the plan and 3whether those services have been provided, (ii) whether 4reasonable efforts have been made by all the parties to the 5service plan to achieve the goal, and (iii) whether the plan 6and goal have been achieved.7    (12) "Petition" means the petition provided for in Section 82-13, 3-15, 4-12, or 5-520, including any supplemental 9petitions thereunder in Section 3-15, 4-12, or 5-520.10    (12.1) "Physically capable adult relative" means a person 1121 years of age or older who does not have a severe physical 12disability or medical condition, or is not suffering from 13alcoholism or drug addiction, that prevents the person from 14providing the care necessary to safeguard the physical safety 15and welfare of a minor who is left in that person's care by the 16parent or parents or other person responsible for the minor's 17welfare. 18    (12.2) "Post Permanency Sibling Contact Agreement" has the 19meaning ascribed to the term in Section 7.4 of the Children and 20Family Services Act. 21    (12.3) "Residential treatment center" means a licensed 22setting that provides 24-hour care to children in a group home 23or institution, including a facility licensed as a child care 24institution under Section 2.06 of the Child Care Act of 1969, a 25licensed group home under Section 2.16 of the Child Care Act of 261969, a qualified residential treatment program under Section   HB1762- 9 -LRB104 06312 JRC 16347 b12.35 of the Child Care Act of 1969, a secure child care 2facility as defined in paragraph (18) of this Section, or any 3similar facility in another state. "Residential treatment 4center" does not include a relative foster home or a licensed 5foster family home. 6    (13) "Residual parental rights and responsibilities" means 7those rights and responsibilities remaining with the parent 8after the transfer of legal custody or guardianship of the 9person, including, but not necessarily limited to, the right 10to reasonable visitation (which may be limited by the court in 11the best interests of the minor as provided in subsection 12(8)(b) of this Section), the right to consent to adoption, the 13right to determine the minor's religious affiliation, and the 14responsibility for the minor's support.15    (14) "Shelter" means the temporary care of a minor in 16physically unrestricting facilities pending court disposition 17or execution of court order for placement.18    (14.05) "Shelter placement" means a temporary or emergency 19placement for a minor, including an emergency foster home 20placement. 21    (14.1) "Sibling Contact Support Plan" has the meaning 22ascribed to the term in Section 7.4 of the Children and Family 23Services Act. 24    (14.2) "Significant event report" means a written document 25describing an occurrence or event beyond the customary 26operations, routines, or relationships in the Department of   HB1762- 10 -LRB104 06312 JRC 16347 b1Children of Family Services, a child care facility, or other 2entity that is licensed or regulated by the Department of 3Children of Family Services or that provides services for the 4Department of Children of Family Services under a grant, 5contract, or purchase of service agreement; involving children 6or youth, employees, foster parents, or relative caregivers; 7allegations of abuse or neglect or any other incident raising 8a concern about the well-being of a minor under the 9jurisdiction of the court under Article II of the Juvenile 10Court Act of 1987; incidents involving damage to property, 11allegations of criminal activity, misconduct, or other 12occurrences affecting the operations of the Department of 13Children of Family Services or a child care facility; any 14incident that could have media impact; and unusual incidents 15as defined by Department of Children and Family Services rule. 16    (15) "Station adjustment" means the informal handling of 17an alleged offender by a juvenile police officer.18    (16) "Ward of the court" means a minor who is so adjudged 19under Section 2-22, 3-23, 4-20, or 5-705, after a finding of 20the requisite jurisdictional facts, and thus is subject to the 21dispositional powers of the court under this Act.22    (17) "Juvenile police officer" means a sworn police 23officer who has completed a Basic Recruit Training Course, has 24been assigned to the position of juvenile police officer by 25the officer's chief law enforcement officer and has completed 26the necessary juvenile officers training as prescribed by the   HB1762- 11 -LRB104 06312 JRC 16347 b1Illinois Law Enforcement Training Standards Board, or in the 2case of a State police officer, juvenile officer training 3approved by the Director of the Illinois State Police.4    (18) "Secure child care facility" means any child care 5facility licensed by the Department of Children and Family 6Services to provide secure living arrangements for children 7under 18 years of age who are subject to placement in 8facilities under the Children and Family Services Act and who 9are not subject to placement in facilities for whom standards 10are established by the Department of Corrections under Section 113-15-2 of the Unified Code of Corrections. "Secure child care 12facility" also means a facility that is designed and operated 13to ensure that all entrances and exits from the facility, a 14building, or a distinct part of the building are under the 15exclusive control of the staff of the facility, whether or not 16the child has the freedom of movement within the perimeter of 17the facility, building, or distinct part of the building.18(Source: P.A. 102-538, eff. 8-20-21; 103-22, eff. 8-8-23; 19103-564, eff. 11-17-23.) 20    (705 ILCS 405/2-17)  (from Ch. 37, par. 802-17)21    Sec. 2-17. Guardian ad litem. 22    (1) Immediately upon the filing of a petition alleging 23that the minor is a person described in Sections 2-3 or 2-4 of 24this Article, the court shall appoint a guardian ad litem for 25the minor if:  HB1762- 12 -LRB104 06312 JRC 16347 b1        (a) such petition alleges that the minor is an abused 2    or neglected child; or3        (b) such petition alleges that charges alleging the 4    commission of any of the sex offenses defined in Article 5    11 or in Sections 11-1.20, 11-1.30, 11-1.40, 11-1.50, 6    11-1.60, 12-13, 12-14, 12-14.1, 12-15 or 12-16 of the 7    Criminal Code of 1961 or the Criminal Code of 2012, have 8    been filed against a defendant in any court and that such 9    minor is the alleged victim of the acts of the defendant in 10    the commission of such offense.11    Unless the guardian ad litem appointed pursuant to this 12paragraph (1) is an attorney at law, the guardian ad litem 13shall be represented in the performance of the guardian ad 14litem's duties by counsel. The guardian ad litem shall 15represent the best interests of the minor and shall present 16recommendations to the court consistent with that duty.17    (2) Before proceeding with the hearing, the court shall 18appoint a guardian ad litem for the minor if: 19        (a) no parent, guardian, custodian or relative of the 20    minor appears at the first or any subsequent hearing of 21    the case;22        (b) the petition prays for the appointment of a 23    guardian with power to consent to adoption; or24        (c) the petition for which the minor is before the 25    court resulted from a report made pursuant to the Abused 26    and Neglected Child Reporting Act.  HB1762- 13 -LRB104 06312 JRC 16347 b1    (3) The court may appoint a guardian ad litem for the minor 2whenever it finds that there may be a conflict of interest 3between the minor and the minor's parents or other custodian 4or that it is otherwise in the minor's best interest to do so.5    (4) Unless the guardian ad litem is an attorney, the 6guardian ad litem shall be represented by counsel.7    (4.5) Pursuant to Section 6b-1 of the Children and Family 8Services Act, the Department of Children and Family Services 9must maintain the name, electronic mail address, and telephone 10number for each minor's court-appointed guardian ad litem and, 11if applicable, the guardian ad litem's supervisor. The 12Department of Children and Family Services must update this 13contact information within 5 days of receiving notice of a 14change. The Advocacy Office for Children and Families, 15established pursuant to Section 5e of the Children and Family 16Services Act, must make this contact information available to 17the minor, current foster parent or caregiver, or caseworker, 18if requested. 19    (5) The reasonable fees of a guardian ad litem appointed 20under this Section shall be fixed by the court and charged to 21the parents of the minor, to the extent they are able to pay. 22If the parents are unable to pay those fees, they shall be paid 23from the general fund of the county.24    (6) A guardian ad litem appointed under this Section, 25shall receive copies of any and all classified reports of 26child abuse and neglect made under the Abused and Neglected   HB1762- 14 -LRB104 06312 JRC 16347 b1Child Reporting Act in which the minor who is the subject of a 2report under the Abused and Neglected Child Reporting Act, is 3also the minor for whom the guardian ad litem is appointed 4under this Section.5    (6.5) A guardian ad litem appointed under this Section or 6attorney appointed under this Act shall receive a copy of each 7significant event report that involves the minor no later than 83 days after the Department learns of an event requiring a 9significant event report to be written, or earlier as required 10by Department rule. 11    (7) The appointed guardian ad litem shall remain the 12minor's guardian ad litem throughout the entire juvenile trial 13court proceedings, including permanency hearings and 14termination of parental rights proceedings, unless there is a 15substitution entered by order of the court.16    (8) The guardian ad litem or an agent of the guardian ad 17litem shall do the following: 18        (A) have a minimum of one in-person contact with the 19    minor and one contact with one of the current foster 20    parents or caregivers prior to the adjudicatory hearing; , 21    and 22        (B) at least one additional in-person contact with the 23    child and one contact with one of the current foster 24    parents or caregivers after the adjudicatory hearing but 25    prior to the first permanency hearing; and 26        (C) one additional in-person contact with the child   HB1762- 15 -LRB104 06312 JRC 16347 b1    and one contact with one of the current foster parents or 2    caregivers each subsequent year; . 3        (D) meet with a child who has been exposed to domestic 4    violence in an age-appropriate manner for at least an hour 5    before the issuance of any judicial decision affecting the 6    parental rights of the child; and7        (E) meet with the child for at least an hour every 3 8    months and provide a written update to the court at least 9    every 6 months. 10        (F) For good cause shown, the judge may excuse 11    face-to-face interviews required in this subsection.12    (9) In counties with a population of 100,000 or more but 13less than 3,000,000, each guardian ad litem must successfully 14complete a training program approved by the Department of 15Children and Family Services. The Department of Children and 16Family Services shall provide training materials and documents 17to guardians ad litem who are not mandated to attend the 18training program. The Department of Children and Family 19Services shall develop and distribute to all guardians ad 20litem a bibliography containing information including but not 21limited to the juvenile court process, termination of parental 22rights, child development, medical aspects of child abuse, and 23the child's need for safety and permanence.24(Source: P.A. 102-208, eff. 7-30-21; 103-22, eff. 8-8-23.) 25    Section 10. The Illinois Marriage and Dissolution of   HB1762- 16 -LRB104 06312 JRC 16347 b1Marriage Act is amended by changing Section 506 as follows: 2    (750 ILCS 5/506)  (from Ch. 40, par. 506)3    Sec. 506. Representation of child. 4    (a) Appointment Duties. In any proceedings involving the 5support, custody, visitation, allocation of parental 6responsibilities, education, parentage, property interest, or 7general welfare of a minor or dependent child, the court may, 8on its own motion or that of any party, appoint an attorney to 9serve in one of the following capacities to address the issues 10the court delineates:11        (1) Attorney. The attorney shall provide independent 12    legal counsel for the child and shall owe the same duties 13    of undivided loyalty, confidentiality, and competent 14    representation as are due an adult client.15        (2) Guardian ad litem qualifications. A guardian ad 16    litem must either be one of the following: . 17            (A) an attorney licensed in Illinois to practice 18        law; or19            (B) a person who holds at a minimum a bachelor's 20        degree in psychology, psychiatry, social work, 21        education, or any other relevant child-related 22        discipline involving determining a child's best 23        interests. 24            (C) Duties of a guardian ad litem. The guardian ad 25        litem shall do the following:   HB1762- 17 -LRB104 06312 JRC 16347 b1                (i) investigate the facts of the case and 2            interview the child and the parties; . 3                (ii) unless Unless the court directs 4            otherwise, the guardian ad litem shall submit to 5            the court and the parties a written report, 6            written recommendations, or a proposed parenting 7            plan, in accordance with the child's best 8            interests, not less than 30 days before a final 9            hearing or trial. The guardian ad litem's written 10            report or written recommendations shall be 11            admitted into evidence without the need for 12            foundation. The guardian ad litem shall be 13            available for deposition before a final hearing or 14            trial notwithstanding any other discovery cutoff. 15            The guardian ad litem may be called as a witness 16            for purposes of cross-examination regarding the 17            guardian ad litem's report or recommendations. At 18            the discretion of the court, the guardian ad 19            litem:20                    (aa) (i) may be present for all 21                proceedings, including in camera examinations 22                of the child;23                    (bb) (ii) may issue subpoenas for records 24                as part of the guardian ad litem's 25                investigation; and26                    (cc) (iii) may file pleadings relating to   HB1762- 18 -LRB104 06312 JRC 16347 b1                procedural matters; .2                    (dd) meet with a child who has been 3                exposed to domestic violence in an 4                age-appropriate manner for at least an hour 5                before the issuance of any judicial decision 6                affecting the parental rights of the child; 7                and8                    (ee) meet with the child for at least an 9                hour every 3 months and provide a written 10                update to the court at least every 6 months.11            (D) Training of a guardian ad litem. A guardian ad 12        litem must receive training as ordered by the Supreme 13        Court of Illinois to ensure the guardian ad litem has a 14        fundamental working knowledge of abuser tactics and 15        its effects on children in domestic violence cases. 16        (3) Child representative. The child representative 17    shall advocate what the child representative finds to be 18    in the best interests of the child after reviewing the 19    facts and circumstances of the case. The child 20    representative shall meet with the child and the parties, 21    investigate the facts of the case, and encourage 22    settlement and the use of alternative forms of dispute 23    resolution. The child representative shall have the same 24    authority and obligation to participate in the litigation 25    as does an attorney for a party and shall possess all the 26    powers of investigation as does a guardian ad litem. The   HB1762- 19 -LRB104 06312 JRC 16347 b1    child representative shall consider, but not be bound by, 2    the expressed wishes of the child. A child representative 3    shall have received training in child advocacy or shall 4    possess such experience as determined to be equivalent to 5    such training by the chief judge of the circuit where the 6    child representative has been appointed. The child 7    representative shall not disclose confidential 8    communications made by the child, except as required by 9    law or by the Rules of Professional Conduct. The child 10    representative shall not render an opinion, 11    recommendation, or report to the court and shall not be 12    called as a witness, but shall offer evidence-based legal 13    arguments. The child representative shall disclose the 14    position as to what the child representative intends to 15    advocate in a pre-trial memorandum that shall be served 16    upon all counsel of record prior to the trial. The 17    position disclosed in the pre-trial memorandum shall not 18    be considered evidence. The court and the parties may 19    consider the position of the child representative for 20    purposes of a settlement conference. 21    (a-3) Additional appointments. During the proceedings the 22court may appoint an additional attorney to serve in the 23capacity described in subdivision (a)(1) or an additional 24attorney to serve in another of the capacities described in 25subdivision (a)(2) or (a)(3) on the court's own motion or that 26of a party only for good cause shown and when the reasons for   HB1762- 20 -LRB104 06312 JRC 16347 b1the additional appointment are set forth in specific findings.2    (a-5) Appointment considerations. In deciding whether to 3make an appointment of an attorney for the minor child, a 4guardian ad litem, or a child representative, the court shall 5consider the nature and adequacy of the evidence to be 6presented by the parties and the availability of other methods 7of obtaining information, including social service 8organizations and evaluations by mental health professions, as 9well as resources for payment. 10    In no event is this Section intended to or designed to 11abrogate the decision making power of the trier of fact. Any 12appointment made under this Section is not intended to nor 13should it serve to place any appointed individual in the role 14of a surrogate judge. 15    (b) Fees and costs. The court shall enter an order as 16appropriate for costs, fees, and disbursements, including a 17retainer, when the attorney, guardian ad litem, or child's 18representative is appointed. Any person appointed under this 19Section shall file with the court within 90 days of his or her 20appointment, and every subsequent 90-day period thereafter 21during the course of his or her representation, a detailed 22invoice for services rendered with a copy being sent to each 23party. The court shall review the invoice submitted and 24approve the fees, if they are reasonable and necessary. Any 25order approving the fees shall require payment by either or 26both parents, by any other party or source, or from the marital   HB1762- 21 -LRB104 06312 JRC 16347 b1estate or the child's separate estate. The court may not order 2payment by the Department of Healthcare and Family Services in 3cases in which the Department is providing child support 4enforcement services under Article X of the Illinois Public 5Aid Code. Unless otherwise ordered by the court at the time 6fees and costs are approved, all fees and costs payable to an 7attorney, guardian ad litem, or child representative under 8this Section are by implication deemed to be in the nature of 9support of the child and are within the exceptions to 10discharge in bankruptcy under 11 U.S.C.A. 523. The provisions 11of Sections 501 and 508 of this Act shall apply to fees and 12costs for attorneys appointed under this Section.13(Source: P.A. 103-126, eff. 1-1-24.)